Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7954.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Legislative findings and purpose.
The general assembly finds and declares that:
(1) Large digital platforms function as primary forums for public discourse and civic
engagement;
(2) Algorithmic ranking systems determine the visibility, amplification, and suppression of
content shown to users;
(3) The criteria used to rank and amplify content are generally opaque and may materially
shape public understanding and consumer decision-making;
(4) Synthetic media, automated amplification, coordinated inauthentic behavior, and
foreign-sponsored influence campaigns have been used to mislead consumers and distort public
discourse;
(5) Consumers in Rhode Island are entitled to accurate, factual information regarding how
content is curated, ranked, and amplified;
(6) The State has a compelling interest in preventing materially deceptive digital practices
and preserving the conditions necessary for informed democratic self-governance.
SECTION 2. Title 6 of the General Laws entitled "COMMERCIAL LAW — GENERAL
REGULATORY PROVISIONS" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 63

DIGITAL PLATFORM TRANSPARENCY AND DEMOCRATIC INTEGRITY ACT
6-63-1. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Algorithmic ranking system" means an automated computational process used to
prioritize, recommend, amplify, demote, or suppress content based on user data, engagement
metrics, behavioral profiling, or other automated inputs.
(2) "Covered platform" means an online service, website, or application that:
(i) Has more than one million (1,000,000) monthly active users nationally; and
(ii) Allows users to create profiles and generate or share content visible to other users.
(3) "Synthetic media" means audio, video, image, or text content that has been materially
generated or altered using artificial intelligence or automated technologies in a manner that would
cause a reasonable person to believe the content depicts a real individual, statement, or event that
did not occur.
(4) "Coordinated inauthentic behavior" means the use of false identities, automated
accounts, or deceptive attribution practices to artificially amplify content.
(5) "Foreign-controlled entity" means an entity owned or controlled, directly or indirectly,
by a foreign government or foreign national as defined under federal election law.
6-63-2. Applicability.
(a) This chapter shall apply only to content presented to users physically located within the
State of Rhode Island.
(b) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to regulate commerce occurring wholly
outside the State of Rhode Island.
6-63-3. Algorithmic transparency requirements.
(a) A covered platform shall publicly disclose, in clear and plain language:
(1) The primary factors used to determine ranking, recommendation, amplification, or
suppression of content;
(2) Whether engagement-based metrics materially affect content visibility;
(3) Whether paid promotion, sponsored placement, or financial incentives influence
content prioritization; and
(4) Whether behavioral profiling materially influences content personalization.
(b) A covered platform shall clearly disclose to users physically located within the state
whether content is presented chronologically or through algorithmic ranking.
(c) Nothing in this section shall require disclosure of proprietary source code, trade secrets,
or confidential business information.
LC005174 - Page 2 of 5

6-63-4. Synthetic media identification and disclosure.
(a) A covered platform shall implement and maintain commercially reasonable policies
and technical measures designed to detect synthetic media that materially depicts real individuals,
statements, or events.
(b) Upon actual knowledge or reasonable detection of synthetic media, a covered platform
shall clearly and conspicuously disclose that such content has been generated or materially altered
using artificial intelligence.
(c) Compliance with this section shall be evaluated based on commercially reasonable
industry standards.
(d) Nothing in this section shall require continuous monitoring of user content or proactive
surveillance beyond commercially reasonable detection practices.
6-63-5. Prohibited deceptive practices.
It shall constitute an unfair and deceptive trade practice under chapter 13.1 of title 6 for a
covered platform to:
(1) Materially misrepresent the operation of its algorithmic ranking systems;
(2) Make an objectively verifiable and materially false representation that its content feed
is neutral, unbiased, or organic where algorithmic amplification materially alters content visibility
without disclosure;
(3) Knowingly fail to provide the disclosures required under this chapter; and
(4) Knowingly permit coordinated inauthentic behavior by foreign-controlled entities after
receiving actual notice of such activity.
6-63-6. Enforcement.
(a) The attorney general may enforce violations of this chapter pursuant to chapter 13.1 of
title 6.
(b) Any Rhode Island resident materially harmed by a violation of this chapter may bring
a civil action for declaratory or injunctive relief.
(c) Civil penalties shall not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per knowing violation.
Each day a knowing violation continues shall constitute a separate violation.
(d) No damages shall be awarded absent proof that the covered platform intentionally or
recklessly violated this chapter.
6-63-7. Construction.
(a) This chapter shall be construed as a content-neutral regulation of commercial conduct
and transparency.
(b) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to:
LC005174 - Page 3 of 5

(1) Regulate speech based on viewpoint or ideology;
(2) Require a platform to host or remove specific content;
(3) Impose liability for third-party content;
(4) Conflict with 47 U.S.C. § 230;
(5) Require continuous monitoring of user speech.
6-63-8. Severability.
If any provision of this chapter is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other
provisions that can be given effect without the invalid provision, and to this end the provisions of
this chapter are declared to be severable.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005174
========
LC005174 - Page 4 of 5